California statutes. Business and Professions Code
Every pharmacist who desires to retain his or her license on the books of the board shall biennially pay to the executive officer of the board the renewal fee, established by the board, within the limits prescribed by this chapter. In return for the payment of the renewal fee, a certificate of renewal shall be issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 139.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4402.

(a) Any pharmacist license that is not renewed within three years following its expiration may not be renewed, restored, or reinstated and shall be canceled by operation of law at the end of the three-year period.

(b) (1) Any pharmacist whose license is canceled pursuant to subdivision (a) may obtain a new license if he or she takes and passes the examination that is required for initial license with the board.

(2) The board may impose conditions on any license issued pursuant to this section, as it deems necessary.

(c) A license that has been revoked by the board under former Section 4411 shall be deemed canceled three years after the board’s revocation action, unless the board has acted to reinstate the license in the interim.

(d) This section shall not affect the authority of the board to proceed with any accusation that has been filed prior to the expiration of the three-year period.

(e) Any other license issued by the board may be canceled by the board if the license is not renewed within 60 days after its expiration. Any license canceled under this subdivision may not be reissued. Instead, a new application will be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4403.

The board shall not reissue or renew any license without the payment of the fees required by this chapter and the payment of all fees that are delinquent at the time that the application is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 539, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4404.

If any license issued under this chapter is lost or destroyed, or if any person desires a reissuance of his or her license, the board may reissue it, subject to Section 4403, upon application therefor, and the submission of satisfactory proof, if required by the board, that the license has been lost or destroyed, or if the license has not been lost or destroyed, upon the surrender of the old license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 836, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4405.

All fines recoverable under this chapter shall be paid by the magistrate receiving the same to the board, except where other provision is made in this chapter for the disposition thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4406.

All fees collected on behalf of the board and all receipts of every kind and nature shall be reported each month for the month preceding to the Controller and at the same time the entire amount shall be paid into the State Treasury and shall be credited to the Pharmacy Board Contingent Fund which is hereby created. This contingent fund shall be available, upon appropriation of the Legislature, for the use of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 43.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4407.

All compensation of members and all other expenses of the board shall be paid out of the examination and registration fees and fines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4409.

At the time a pharmacy license is renewed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4110 or a pharmacist license is renewed pursuant to Section 4401, the pharmacy or pharmacist may make a contribution of at least twenty-five dollars ($25), to be submitted to the board, for the sole purpose of funding the California Pharmacist Scholarship and Loan Repayment Program established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 128198) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code. The contribution submitted pursuant to this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the California Pharmacist Scholarship and Loan Repayment Program Fund established pursuant to Section 128198.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 24. Prescription Rates for Medicare Beneficiaries [4425. - 4426.]

4425.

(a) As a condition for the participation of a pharmacy in the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the pharmacy, upon presentation of a valid prescription for the patient and the patient’s Medicare card, shall charge Medicare beneficiaries a price that does not exceed the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for prescription medicines, and an amount, as set by the State Department of Health Care Services to cover electronic transmission charges. However, Medicare beneficiaries shall not be allowed to use the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for over-the-counter medications or compounded prescriptions.

(b) The
 State Department of Health Care Services shall provide a mechanism to calculate and transmit the price to the pharmacy, but shall not apply the Medi-Cal drug utilization review process for purposes of this section.

(c) The State Department of Health Care Services shall monitor pharmacy participation with the requirements of subdivision (a).

(d) The State Department of Health Care Services shall conduct an outreach program to inform Medicare beneficiaries of their right to participate in the program described in subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Including on its Internet Web site the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for, at minimum, 200 of the most commonly prescribed medicines and updating this information monthly.

(2) Providing a sign to participating pharmacies that the pharmacies shall prominently display at the point of service and at the point of sale, reminding the Medicare beneficiaries to ask that the charge for their prescription be the same amount as the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate and providing the department’s telephone number, e-mail address, and Internet Web site address to access information about the program.

(e) If prescription drugs are added to the scope of benefits available under the federal Medicare program, the Senate Office of Research shall report that fact to the appropriate committees of the Legislature. It is the intent of the Legislature to evaluate the need to continue the implementation of this article under those circumstances.

(f) This section shall not apply to a prescription that is covered by insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 34.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4426.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall conduct a study of the adequacy of Medi-Cal pharmacy reimbursement rates including the cost of providing prescription drugs and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 35.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 25. Automated Drug Delivery System [4427. - 4427.8.]

4427.

As used in this article, “drugs” or “dangerous drugs” shall have the same meaning as “dangerous drug” as provided in Section 4022 and “devices” or “dangerous devices” shall have the same meaning as “dangerous device” as provided in Section 4022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 666, Sec. 9.   (SB 1447)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 4427.8.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.1.

An ADDS shall not be installed or operated in California unless it meets the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 666, Sec. 9.   (SB 1447)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 4427.8.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.2.

(a) An ADDS installed, leased, owned, or operated in California shall be licensed by the board.

(b) An ADDS license shall only be issued to the holder of a current, valid, and active pharmacy license of a pharmacy located and licensed in California.

(c) A separate application and license shall be required for each ADDS.

(d) An ADDS license shall only be issued when the following conditions are met:

(1) Use of the ADDS is consistent with legal requirements.

(2) The proposed location for installation of the ADDS meets the requirements of Section 4427.3 and the ADDS is secure from access and removal by unauthorized individuals.

(3) The pharmacy’s policies and procedures related to the ADDS include appropriate security measures and monitoring of the inventory to prevent theft and diversion.

(4) The pharmacy’s policies and procedures include provisions for reporting to the board drug losses from the ADDS inventory, as required by law.

(e) Prior to issuance of the license, the board shall conduct a prelicensure inspection, within 30 days of a completed application for an ADDS license, at the proposed location of the ADDS. Relocation of the ADDS shall require a new
 application for licensure. Replacement of an ADDS shall require notification to the board within 30 days.

(f) The ADDS license shall be canceled by operation of law if the underlying pharmacy license is not current, valid, and active. Upon reissuance or reinstatement of the underlying pharmacy license, a new application for an ADDS license may be submitted to the board.

(g) The holder of an ADDS license shall advise the board in writing within 30 days if use of the ADDS is discontinued.

(h) The ADDS license shall be renewed annually, and the renewal date shall be the same as the underlying pharmacy license.

(i) An AUDS operated by a licensed hospital pharmacy, as defined
 in Section 4029, and used solely to provide doses administered to patients while in a licensed general acute care hospital facility, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, to patients while in a licensed acute psychiatric hospital facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or dispensed to patients pursuant to Section 4068 shall be exempt from the requirement of obtaining an ADDS license pursuant to this section if the licensed hospital pharmacy owns or leases the AUDS and owns the dangerous drugs and dangerous devices in the AUDS. The AUDS shall comply with all other requirements for an ADDS in this article. The licensed
 hospital pharmacy shall maintain a list of the locations of each AUDS it operates and shall make the list available to the board upon request.

(j) An ADDS license is not required for technology, installed within the secured licensed premises area of a pharmacy, used in the selecting, counting, packaging, and labeling of dangerous drugs and dangerous devices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 363, Sec. 2.   (AB 447)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.3.

(a) An ADDS shall be placed and operated inside an enclosed building, with a premises address, at a location approved by the board.

(b) An ADDS shall be placed and operated in one of the following locations:

(1) Adjacent to the secured pharmacy area of the pharmacy holding the ADDS license.

(2) A health facility licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code that complies with Section 1261.6 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A clinic licensed pursuant to Section 1204 or 1204.1 of the Health and Safety Code, or Section 4180 or 4190 of this code.

(4) A correctional clinic licensed pursuant to Section 4187.1.

(5) If the ADDS is an APDS, in a location as provided in Section 4427.6.

(6) If the ADDS is an AUDS, in a location as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 4427.65.

(c) Prior to installation, the pharmacy holding the ADDS license and the location where the ADDS is placed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall jointly develop and implement written policies and procedures to ensure safety, accuracy, accountability, security, patient confidentiality, and maintenance of the ADDS, as well as quality, potency, and purity of the drugs and devices. These policies and procedures shall be maintained at the location of the ADDS and at the pharmacy holding the ADDS
 license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 31.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.4.

(a) The ADDS shall be owned or leased by the pharmacy holding the license for the ADDS.

(b) Each ADDS shall only be operated under the supervision of the pharmacy holding the ADDS license.

(c) An ADDS shall be considered an extension and part of the pharmacy holding the ADDS license, regardless of the ADDS location, and shall be subject to inspection pursuant to Section 4008.

(d) Drugs and devices stored in an ADDS shall be deemed part of the inventory and the responsibility of the pharmacy holding the ADDS license, and drugs and devices dispensed from the ADDS shall be considered to have been dispensed by that
 pharmacy. 

(e) (1) The stocking and restocking of an ADDS shall be performed by a pharmacist, or by a pharmacy technician or intern pharmacist under the supervision of a pharmacist, except for an ADDS located in a health facility licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, where the stocking and restocking of the ADDS may be performed in compliance with Section 1261.6 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(2) Access to the ADDS shall be controlled and tracked using an identification or password system or biosensor. 

(3) The ADDS shall make a complete and accurate record of all transactions that includes all users accessing the system and all drugs added to, or removed from, the system. 

(f) If drugs or devices are not immediately transferred into an ADDS upon arrival at the ADDS location, the drugs and devices shall be stored for no longer than 48 hours in a secured room within the ADDS location approved by the board under Section 4427.3. Upon retrieval of these drugs and devices from secured storage, an inventory shall be taken to detect any losses or overages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 666, Sec. 9.   (SB 1447)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 4427.8.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.5.

Prior to installation, and annually thereafter, the pharmacy holding the ADDS license shall provide training on the operation and use of the ADDS to pharmacy personnel and to personnel using the ADDS at the location where the ADDS is placed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4427.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 666, Sec. 9.   (SB 1447)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 4427.8.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.6.

In addition to any other requirements imposed by this article, an APDS shall additionally meet the following requirements:

(a) The pharmacy shall develop and implement, and review annually, written policies and procedures pertaining to the APDS, including all of the following:

(1) Maintaining the security of the APDS and the dangerous drugs and dangerous devices within that APDS.

(2) Determining and applying inclusion criteria regarding which drugs and devices are appropriate for placement in the APDS and for which patients.

(3) Ensuring that patients are aware that
 consultation with a pharmacist is available for any prescription medication, including for those delivered via the APDS.

(4) Describing assignment of responsibilities to, and training of, pharmacy personnel, and other personnel using the APDS at the location where the APDS is placed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4427.3, regarding maintenance and filing procedures for the APDS.

(5) Orienting participating patients on the use of the APDS, notifying patients when expected prescription medications are not available in the APDS, and ensuring that patient use of the APDS does not interfere with delivery of drugs and devices.

(6) Ensuring delivery of drugs and devices to patients expecting to receive them from the APDS in the event the APDS is disabled or malfunctions.

(b) The APDS shall only be used for patients who have signed a written consent form demonstrating their informed consent to receive prescribed drugs and devices from an APDS, and whose use of the APDS meets inclusion criteria established pursuant to subdivision (a). 

(c) The APDS shall have a means to identify each patient and only release the identified patient’s drugs and devices to the patient or the patient’s agent.

(d) A pharmacist licensed by the board shall perform all clinical services conducted as part of the dispensing process, including, but not limited to, drug utilization review and consultation.

(e) Drugs shall be dispensed from the APDS only upon authorization by a licensed pharmacist after the pharmacist has reviewed the prescription and the
 patient’s profile for potential contraindications and adverse drug reactions. 

(f) All prescribed drugs and devices dispensed to a patient from an APDS for the first time shall be accompanied by a consultation conducted by a pharmacist licensed by the board via a telecommunications link that has two-way audio and video.

(g) The APDS shall include a notice, prominently posted on the APDS, providing the name, address, and phone number of the pharmacy that holds the ADDS license for that APDS.

(h) The labels on all drugs and devices dispensed by the APDS shall comply with Section 4076 and with Section 1707.5 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(i) Any incident involving the APDS where a complaint, error, or omission has occurred shall be
 reviewed as part of the pharmacy’s quality assurance program pursuant to Section 4125.

 (j) An APDS may be located and operated in a medical office or other location where patients are regularly seen for purposes of diagnosis and treatment, and the APDS is only used to dispense dangerous drugs and dangerous devices to patients of the practice.

(k) The board shall not issue a pharmacy more than 15 ADDS licenses for APDS units. Consistent with Section 4001.1, the board, by regulation, may reduce the number of ADDS licenses a pharmacy may be issued for APDS units.

(l) The pharmacy holding the ADDS license for an APDS shall maintain the policies and procedures developed pursuant to subdivision (a) for three years after the last date of use of that APDS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 666, Sec. 9.   (SB 1447)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 4427.8.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.65.

(a) In addition to the locations authorized in Section 4427.3, an automated unit dose system (AUDS) may also be located and operated in either of the following locations:

(1) A facility licensed by this state with the statutory authority to provide pharmaceutical services.

(2) Jail, youth detention facility, or other correctional facility where drugs are administered within the facility under the authority of the medical director.

(b) The pharmacy operating the AUDS shall develop and implement, and review annually, written policies and procedures pertaining to the device.

(c) The pharmacy shall operate the AUDS in compliance with the following requirements:

(1) Transaction information shall be made readily available in a written format for review and inspection by individuals authorized by law. These records shall be maintained in the facility for a minimum of three years.

(2) Individualized and specific access to automated drug delivery systems shall be limited to facility and contract personnel authorized by law to administer drugs.

(3) (A) The facility and the pharmacy shall develop and implement written policies and procedures to ensure safety, accuracy, accountability, security, patient confidentiality, and maintenance of the quality, potency, and purity of stored drugs. Policies and procedures
 shall define access to the automated drug delivery system and limits to access to equipment and drugs.

(B) All policies and procedures shall be maintained at the pharmacy operating the automated drug delivery system and the location where the automated drug delivery system is being used.

(4) When used as an emergency pharmaceutical supplies container, drugs removed from the automated drug delivery system shall be limited to the following:

(A) A new drug order given by a prescriber for a patient of the facility for administration prior to the next scheduled delivery from the pharmacy, or 72 hours, whichever is less. The drugs shall be retrieved only upon authorization by a pharmacist and after the pharmacist has reviewed the prescriber’s order and the patient’s profile for potential contraindications and adverse drug
 reactions.

(B) Drugs that a prescriber has ordered for a patient on an as-needed basis, if the utilization and retrieval of those drugs are subject to ongoing review by a pharmacist.

(C) Drugs designed by the patient care policy committee or pharmaceutical service committee of the facility as emergency drugs or acute onset drugs. These drugs may be retrieved from an automated drug delivery system pursuant to the order of a prescriber for emergency or immediate administration to a patient of the facility. Within 48 hours after retrieval under this paragraph, the case shall be reviewed by a pharmacist.

(5) When used to provide pharmacy services pursuant to Section 4017.3 and this article, the automated drug delivery system shall be subject to all of the following requirements:

(A) Drugs removed from the automated drug delivery system for administration to a patient shall be in properly labeled units of administration containers or packages.

(B) A pharmacist shall review and approve all orders prior to a drug being removed from the automated drug delivery system for administration to a patient. The pharmacist shall review the prescriber’s order and the patient’s profile for potential contraindications and adverse drug reactions.

(C) The pharmacy providing services to the facility pursuant to this article shall control access to the drugs stored in the automated drug delivery system.

(D) Access to the automated drug delivery system shall be controlled and tracked using an identification or password system or biosensor.

(E) The automated drug delivery system shall make a complete and accurate record of all transactions that will include all users accessing the system and all drugs added to, or removed from, the system.

(F) After the pharmacist reviews the prescriber’s order, access by licensed personnel to the automated drug delivery system shall be limited only to drugs ordered by the prescriber and reviewed by the pharmacist and that are specific to the patient. When the prescriber’s order requires a dosage variation of the same drug, licensed personnel shall have access to the drug ordered for that scheduled time of administration.

(G) Systems that allow licensed personnel to have access to multiple drugs and are not patient specific in their design, shall be allowed under this subdivision if those systems have electronic and
 mechanical safeguards in place to ensure that the drugs delivered to the patient are specific to that patient.

(6) The stocking of an automated drug delivery system shall be performed by a pharmacist. If the automated drug delivery system utilizes removable pockets, cards, drawers, similar technology, or unit of use or single dose containers, as defined by the United States Pharmacopoeia, the stocking system may be done outside of the facility and be delivered to the facility, if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The task of placing drugs into the removable pockets, cards, drawers, or unit of use or single dose containers is performed by a pharmacist, or by an intern pharmacist or a pharmacy technician working under the direct supervision of a pharmacist.

(B) The removable pockets, cards, drawers, or unit
 of use or single dose containers are transported between the pharmacy and the facility in a secure tamper-evident container.

(C) The facility, in conjunction with the pharmacy, has developed policies and procedures to ensure that the removable pockets, cards, drawers, or unit of use or single dose containers are properly placed into the automated drug delivery system.

(7) Review of the drugs contained within, and the operation and maintenance of, the automated drug delivery system shall be done in accordance with law and shall be the responsibility of the pharmacy. A pharmacist shall conduct the review on a monthly basis, which shall include a physical inspection of the drugs in the automated drug delivery system, an inspection of the automated drug delivery system machine for cleanliness, and a review of all transaction records in order to verify the security and accountability
 of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 32.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.7.

(a) A pharmacy holding an ADDS license shall complete a self-assessment, performed pursuant to Section 1715 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, evaluating the pharmacy’s compliance with pharmacy law relating to the use of the ADDS. All information regarding operation, maintenance, compliance, error, omissions, or complaints pertaining to the ADDS shall be included in the self-assessment.

(b) The pharmacy shall comply with all recordkeeping and quality assurance requirements established in pharmacy law and regulation, and shall maintain those records within the licensed pharmacy holding the ADDS license and separate from other pharmacy records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 33.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.8.

(a) This article shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(b) On or before January 1, 2025, as part of the board’s sunset evaluation process, and notwithstanding Sections 9795 and 10231.5 of the Government Code, the board shall report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature on the regulation of ADDS units as provided in this article. At a minimum, this report shall require all of the following:

(1) The use and dispersion of ADDS throughout the health care system.

(2) The number of ADDS inspections conducted by the board each year and the findings from the inspections.

(3) Public safety concerns relating to the use of ADDS as identified by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 55.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9.5. Audits of Pharmacy Benefits [4430. - 4441.]

4430.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Carrier” means a health care service plan, as defined in Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, or a health insurer that issues policies of health insurance, as defined in Section 106 of the Insurance Code.

(b) “Clerical or recordkeeping error” includes a typographical error, scrivener’s error, or computer error in a required document or record.

(c) “Extrapolation” means the practice of inferring a frequency or dollar amount of overpayments, underpayments, nonvalid claims, or other errors on any portion of claims submitted, based on the frequency or dollar amount of overpayments,
 underpayments, nonvalid claims, or other errors actually measured in a sample of claims.

(d) “Health benefit plan” means any plan or program that provides, arranges, pays for, or reimburses the cost of health benefits. “Health benefit plan” includes, but is not limited to, a health care service plan contract issued by a health care service plan, as defined in Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, and a policy of health insurance, as defined in Section 106 of the Insurance Code, issued by a health insurer.

(e) “Maximum allowable cost” means the maximum amount that a pharmacy benefit manager will reimburse a pharmacy for the cost of a drug.

(f) “Maximum allowable cost list” means a list of drugs for which a maximum allowable cost has been established by a pharmacy benefit manager.

(g) “Obsolete” means a drug that may be listed in national drug pricing compendia but is no longer available to be dispensed based on the expiration date of the last lot manufactured.

(h) “Pharmacy” has the same meaning as provided in Section 4037.

(i) “Pharmacy audit” means an audit, either onsite or remotely, of any records of a pharmacy conducted by or on behalf of a carrier or a pharmacy benefits manager, or a representative thereof, for prescription drugs that were dispensed by that pharmacy to beneficiaries of a health benefit plan pursuant to a contract with the health benefit plan or the issuer or administrator thereof. “Pharmacy audit” does not include a concurrent review or desk audit that occurs within three business days of transmission of a claim, or a concurrent review or desk audit if a chargeback or
 recoupment is not demanded.

(j) “Pharmacy benefit manager” means a person, business, or other entity that, pursuant to a contract or under an employment relationship with a carrier, health benefit plan sponsor, or other third-party payer, either directly or through an intermediary, manages the prescription drug coverage provided by the carrier, plan sponsor, or other third-party payer, including, but not limited to, the processing and payment of claims for prescription drugs, the performance of drug utilization review, the processing of drug prior authorization requests, the adjudication of appeals or grievances related to prescription drug coverage, contracting with network pharmacies, and controlling the cost of covered prescription drugs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 8.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4431.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to an audit conducted because a pharmacy benefit manager, carrier, health benefit plan sponsor, or other third-party payer has indications that support a reasonable suspicion that criminal wrongdoing, willful misrepresentation, fraud, or abuse has occurred.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to an audit conducted by, or at the direction of, the California State Board of Pharmacy, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Public Health, or the Medicare program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (SB 1195)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4432.

Notwithstanding any other law, a contract that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2013, between a pharmacy and a carrier or a pharmacy benefit manager to provide pharmacy services to beneficiaries of a health benefit plan shall comply with the provisions of this chapter. This chapter shall not apply to contracts authorized by Section 4600.2 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 74, Sec. 2.   (AB 627)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4433.

(a) An entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall not receive payment or any other consideration on any basis that is tied to the amount claimed or actual amount recovered from the pharmacy that is the subject of the audit. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prevent the pharmacy benefit manager or health benefit plan from charging or assessing the plan sponsor, directly or indirectly, based on amounts recouped if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The plan sponsor and the pharmacy benefit manager or health benefit plan have a contract that explicitly states the percentage charge or assessment to the plan sponsor.

(2) No commission or financial incentive is paid to an agent or employee of the entity conducting the pharmacy audit based, directly or indirectly, on amounts recouped.

(b) A pharmacy shall not be subject to recoupment of funds for a clerical or recordkeeping error, unless the error resulted in actual financial harm to the pharmacy benefit manager, the carrier, or the beneficiary of a health benefit plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (SB 1195)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4434.

(a) Except as otherwise prohibited by state or federal law, an entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall keep confidential any information collected during the course of the audit and shall not share any information with any person other than the carrier, pharmacy benefit manager, or third-party payer for which the audit is being performed. An entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall have access only to previous audit reports relating to a particular pharmacy conducted by or on behalf of the same entity. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize access to information that is otherwise prohibited by law. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit any employer, trust fund, government agency, or any other entity for which the audit is
 being performed from disclosing its general opinions or conclusions regarding the business practices of the pharmacy based on the audit.

(b) An entity that is not a carrier or pharmacy benefit manager and that is conducting a pharmacy audit on behalf of a carrier or pharmacy benefit manager shall, prior to conducting the audit, notify the pharmacy in writing that the entity and the carrier or pharmacy benefit manager have executed a business associate agreement or other agreement as required under state and federal privacy laws.

(c) An entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall, prior to leaving a pharmacy at the end of an onsite portion of the audit, provide the pharmacist in charge with a complete list of records reviewed to allow the pharmacy to account for disclosures as required by state and federal privacy laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (SB 1195)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4435.

(a) An entity conducting an onsite pharmacy audit shall not initiate or schedule a pharmacy audit during the first five business days of any calendar month, unless it is expressly agreed to by the pharmacy being audited.

(b) An entity conducting an onsite pharmacy audit shall provide the pharmacy at least two weeks’ prior written notice before conducting an initial audit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (SB 1195)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4436.

(a) A pharmacy audit that involves clinical judgment shall be conducted by, or in consultation with, a licensed pharmacist.

(b) An entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall make all determinations regarding the legal validity of a prescription or other record consistent with determinations made pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 4070) of Chapter 9.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a pharmacy benefits manager from denying a claim, either in whole or in part, for failure to comply with federal Food and Drug Administration or manufacturer requirements, the prescription drug formulary, prior authorization
 requirements, days’ supply requirements, or other coverage or plan design requirement, or for failure to include a National Provider Identification number.

(d) An entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall accept paper or electronic signature logs that document the delivery of pharmacy services to a health plan beneficiary or his or her agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (SB 1195)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4437.

The time period covered by a pharmacy audit shall not exceed 24 months from the date that the claim was submitted to, or adjudicated by, the pharmacy benefits manager, unless a longer period is required under state or federal law or unless the originating prescription is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (SB 1195)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4438.

(a) (1) An entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall deliver a preliminary audit report to the pharmacy before issuing a final audit report. This preliminary report shall be issued no later than 60 days after conclusion of the audit.

(2) A pharmacy shall be provided a time period of at least 30 days following receipt of the preliminary audit report under paragraph (1) to respond to the findings in the report, including addressing any alleged mistakes or discrepancies and producing documentation to that effect.

(3) To validate the pharmacy record and delivery, the pharmacy may use authentic and verifiable statements or
 records, including medication administration records of a nursing home, assisted living facility, hospital, physician and surgeon, or other authorized prescriber, or additional documentation parameters located in the provider manual.

(4) Any legal prescription may be used to validate claims in connection with prescriptions, refills, or changes in prescriptions, including medication administration records, facsimiles, electronic prescriptions, electronically stored images of prescriptions, electronically created annotations, or documented telephone calls from the prescriber or the prescriber’s agent. Unless specifically addressed in the audit policies and procedures contained in the contract or provider manual, documentation of an oral prescription order that has been verified by the prescriber shall meet the requirements of this subdivision.

(5) If an entity conducting a pharmacy
 audit uses extrapolation to calculate penalties or amounts to be recouped, the pharmacy may present evidence to validate orders for dangerous drugs or devices that are subject to invalidation due to extrapolation.

(6) Prior to issuing a final audit report, an entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall take into consideration any response by the pharmacy to the preliminary audit report provided within the timeframes allowed under this section, unless otherwise agreed to by the entity conducting the audit.

(b) (1) An entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall deliver a final audit report to the pharmacy no later than 120 days after receipt of a pharmacy’s response to the preliminary audit report.

(2) An entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall establish, in the contract between the pharmacy and the
 contracting entity, a process for appealing the findings in a final audit report that complies with the following requirements:

(A) A pharmacy shall be provided a time period of at least 30 days following receipt of the final audit report to file an appeal with the entity identified in the appeal process.

(B) An entity conducting a pharmacy audit shall provide the pharmacy with a written determination of appeal issued by the entity identified in the appeal process, which shall be appended to the final audit report, and a copy of the determination shall be sent to the carrier, health benefit plan sponsor, or other third-party payer.

(C) If, following the appeal, either party is not satisfied with the appeal, the party may seek relief under the terms of the contract.
